Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-647
City manager; investigatory and inquisitional powers.

The city manager may investigate at any time the affairs of any department or the conduct of any officer or employee. He, or any person or persons appointed by him for the purpose, shall have the same power to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers and other evidence, and to punish for contempt, which has herein been conferred upon the council.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 48, p. 511;

C.S.1922, § 4585;

C.S.1929, § 19-648;

R.S.1943, § 19-647.